District of Columbia statutes.
1-308.21

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-203, § 2, 53 DCR 9055
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 15, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3033(a), 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3003, 58 DCR 6226
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Act 16-512, the District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Assistance Repayment Program Emergency Act of 2006, and any substantially identical successor legislation, see Mayor’s Order 2006-161, November 8, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9362).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3033(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-563, December 19, 2006, 53 DCR 10259).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of District of Columbia Poverty Lawyer Loan Repayment Program Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-512, October 25, 2006, 53 DCR 9086).